Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 3 Garbage Feeding

4-3-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of §§

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1 the following words shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

“Director” means the director of environmental management or the director’s authorized agent.

“Garbage” means putrescible animal and vegetable wastes resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking and consumption of foods including animal carcasses or parts,

“Person” means the state, any municipality, political subdivision, institution, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, or other entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-1

; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 13.

4-3-2.
Applicability of §§ 4-3-1 — 4-3-11.

Sections

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1 shall apply to any person or persons who feeds garbage, other than from his or her own domestic household, to more than four (4) swine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-2

.

4-3-3.
Permit required to feed garbage.

No person shall feed garbage to swine without first securing a permit from the director. This permit shall be renewed on the first day of July of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-3

.

4-3-4.
Application for permit — Fee.

Any person desiring to obtain a permit to feed garbage to swine shall make written application to the director in accordance with the requirements of the director. At the time of filing an application, the applicant shall pay to the director a permit fee in the sum of five dollars ($5.00) for the general use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 3.

4-3-5.
Requirements for permit.

The following conditions are required for a garbage feeding permit:

The feeding area is equipped with a cement base or constructed of other material approved by the director;

The feeding area or platforms shall be constructed as to be readily cleaned daily, and to allow for all refuse to be disposed of;

Housing meets existing sanitary and humane standards, regarding ventilation, drainage, and warmth;

Premises upon which swine are kept must be kept clean and sanitary and meet the regulations of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-5

.

4-3-6.
Cooking or treatment of garbage.

All garbage, regardless of previous processing, shall, before being fed to swine, be thoroughly heated to two hundred twelve degrees Fahrenheit (212 degrees F.) for at least thirty (30) minutes, unless treated in some other manner which shall be approved in writing by the director as being equally effective for the protection of public health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-6

.

4-3-7.
Revocation or denial of permits.

Upon determination that any person having a permit issued under §§

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1 or who has applied for a permit, has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of §§ 4-3-1 —

4-3-11

, or any of the rules or regulations promulgated under these sections, the director may, after notice to the registrant, and after affording the registrant an opportunity to be heard, revoke the permit or refuse to issue a permit to an applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-7

.

4-3-8.
Access of inspectors to property.

Any authorized representative of the director has the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purposes of inspection and investigating conditions relating to the treating of garbage to be fed to swine as required by §§

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-8

.

4-3-9.
Maintenance and examination of records.

Any authorized representative of the director may examine any records or memoranda pertaining to the feeding of garbage to swine. The director may require maintenance of records relating to the operation of equipment for and procedure of treating garbage to be fed to swine. Copies of those records shall be submitted to the director on request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-9

.

4-3-10.
Enforcement — Rules and regulations.

The director is hereby charged with administration and enforcement of the provisions of §§

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1 and is authorized to make and enforce all rules and regulations which the director deems necessary to carry out the purposes of §§ 4-3-1 —

4-3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-10

.

4-3-11.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or who fails to perform any duty imposed by §§

4-3-1

—

4-3-1

1 or who violates any rule or regulation promulgated under these sections is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200). In addition, that person may be enjoined from continuing that violation. Each day upon which that violation occurs constitutes a separate violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3355, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-11

.

4-3-12.
Approval of feeding sites by a city or town council.

No swine shall be kept in any city or town, to be fed on swill, offal or other decaying substances, brought from any other city or town, except in a place in the city or town as is designated by the city or town council. Any person violating this section is liable to the penalty prescribed in §

23-23.5-11

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 91, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 107, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 119, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 601, §§ 13,14; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-12

.

4-3-13.
Carrying of swill into Middletown.

No person shall carry any house offal or swill into the town of Middletown, or permit the swill or offal so carried to be fed to swine on his or her premises, or to be deposited on or spread upon his or her land, in that town. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the carrying of swill or house offal through the town of Middletown to any other town. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be for every offense fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 282, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 348, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 400, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 611, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-13

.